Rhode Island statutes. Title 39 Public Utilities and Carriers
Chapter 12 Motor Carriers of Property

39-12-1.
Declaration of policy.

It is hereby declared to be the policy of the state to regulate transportation of property by motor carriers upon its publicly used highways in such manner as to recognize and preserve the inherent advantages of transportation, and to foster sound economic conditions in transportation and among carriers engaged therein in the public interest; and in connection therewith to:

Promote adequate, economical, and efficient service by motor carriers and reasonable charges therefor without unjust discriminations, undue preferences, or advantages or unfair or destructive competitive practices;

Improve the relations between, and coordinate transportation by and the regulations of motor carriers and other carriers;

Develop and preserve a highway transportation system properly adapted to the needs of the commerce of the state; and

Promote safety upon its publicly used highways in the interest of its citizens.

History of Section.

P.L. 1935, ch. 2268, art. 1, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 99, art. 1, § 1; P.L. 1946, ch. 1805, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

39-12-1

; P.L. 1958, ch. 87, § 1.

39-12-2.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

“Administrator” means the public utilities administrator.

“Certificate” means a certificate of public convenience and necessity issued under this chapter or by any corresponding provisions of earlier laws to a common carrier by motor vehicle.

“Common carrier” means any person who or that undertakes, whether directly or by any other arrangements, to transport property, or any class or classes of property, by motor vehicle between points within this state, for the general public for compensation, over the publicly used highways of this state, whether over regular or irregular routes.

“Contract carrier” means any person who or that engages in transportation by motor vehicle of property in intrastate commerce, for compensation (other than transportation referred to in the preceding paragraph), under continuing contracts with one person or an unlimited number of persons for the furnishing of transportation services of a special and individual nature required by the shipper and not generally provided by common carriers.

“Driveaway-towaway operations” means any operation in which any motor vehicle or motor vehicles, new or used, constitute the commodity being transported, when one set or more of wheels of any motor vehicle or motor vehicles are on the highway during the course of transportation, whether or not any motor vehicle furnishes the automotive power.

“Driver” means any person operating a motor vehicle used for the transportation of property, that he or she owns or is operating with the express or implied consent of its owner.

“Interstate carrier” means any person who or that operates motor vehicles for the transportation of property of others for compensation over the publicly used highways of this state in interstate commerce authorized or certified by the Interstate Commerce Commission.

“Interstate commerce” means commerce between any place in this state and any place in another state or between places in this state through another state.

“Interstate permit” means an interstate carrier permit issued by the administrator to an interstate common or contract carrier by motor vehicle operating for compensation over the publicly used highways of this state.

“Intrastate commerce” means any commerce wholly within this state by motor vehicle between points having a point of origin and a point of destination within this state.

“Irregular route” means a route or routes within the territory as set forth in the carrier’s certificate, but not over a specified route or routes between fixed termini.

“Motor carrier” means a common carrier by motor vehicle, a contract carrier by motor vehicle, or an interstate carrier by motor vehicle.

“Motor vehicle” means any vehicle, machine, truck, tractor-trailer, or semi-trailer propelled or drawn by any mechanical power and used upon the highways in the transportation of property, but does not include any vehicle or car operated on a rail or rails whether on or off the publicly used highways.

“Natural subdivision” means a group of persons engaged in the motor trucking industry that, by the nature and similarity of the service performed, has operating interests peculiar to the groups and that by reason thereof requires distinct and separate regulations.

“Permit” means a permit issued under this chapter or corresponding provisions of earlier laws to a contract carrier by motor vehicle.

“Person” means any individual, firm, co-partnership, corporation, company, association, or joint stock association, and includes any trustee, receiver, assignee, or personal representative thereof; and, where the context requires shall include “driver,” as defined in this section.

“Private carrier” means any person, other than a common carrier or a contract carrier or an interstate carrier who or that transports in intrastate or interstate commerce by motor vehicle, property of which the person is the owner, lessee, or bailee, when the transportation is for the purpose of sale, lease, rent, or bailment, or in the furtherance of any commercial enterprise. The private carrier shall be exempted from the provisions of this chapter.

“Publicly used highways” means all public ways, roads, highways, streets, avenues, alleys, boulevards, parks, squares, and bridges and approaches thereto, within this state.

“Regular route” means a specified route or routes, between fixed termini, as set forth in the carrier’s certificate.

History of Section.

P.L. 1935, ch. 2268, art. 2, §§ 1-8; G.L. 1938, ch. 99, art. 2, §§ 1-8; G.L. 1938, ch. 99, art. 2, §§ 1-10; P.L. 1946, ch. 1805, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

39-12-2

; P.L. 1958, ch. 87, § 1; P.L. 1967, ch. 209, § 1; P.L. 1984, ch. 81, § 15.

39-12-3.
Exemption from regulations.

There shall be exempted from the provisions of this chapter:

Motor vehicles while engaged exclusively in the delivery of United States mail;

Motor vehicles owned and operated by the government of the United States;

Motor vehicles owned and operated by a cooperative group and used exclusively for the transportation of the property of the cooperative group or its members;

Motor vehicles used exclusively in the transportation of agricultural commodities or horticultural commodities or products from a farm, or farm supplies to a farm;

Motor vehicles engaged in the plowing or removal of snow from the publicly used highways within this state;

Motor vehicles engaged in the transportation of garbage, ashes, and debris removed from private dwellings, commercial, and industrial establishments;

Motor vehicles engaged exclusively in transporting newspapers.

History of Section.

P.L. 1935, ch. 2268, art. 5, § 6; G.L. 1938, ch. 99, art. 5, § 6; G.L. 1938, ch. 99, art. 5, § 3; P.L. 1946, ch. 1805, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

39-12-34

; G.L. 1956, §

39-12-3

; P.L. 1958, ch. 87, § 1.

39-12-4.
General powers and duties of the administrator.

It shall be the duty of the administrator:

To regulate common carriers by motor vehicle as provided in this chapter, and, to that end, the administrator may establish reasonable requirements with respect to continuous and adequate service, uniform system of accounts, records and reports, and preservation of records;

To regulate contract carriers by motor vehicle as provided in this chapter, and, to that end, the administrator may establish reasonable requirements with respect to uniform system of accounts, records, and reports, and preservation of records;

To administer, execute, and enforce all provisions of this chapter, to make all necessary orders in connection therewith, and to prescribe rules, regulations, and procedure of administration;

For the purposes of the administration of the provisions of this chapter, to inquire into the management of the business of motor carriers and into the management of the business of persons controlling, controlled by, or under common control with, motor carriers to the extent that the business of the persons is related to the management of the business of one or more motor carriers, and the administrator shall keep himself or herself informed as to the manner and method in which the businesses are conducted, and may obtain from the carriers and persons the information as the administrator deems necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter;

To administer, execute, and enforce all provisions of chapter 12.1 of this title and to make all necessary orders in connection therewith and to prescribe rules, regulations, and procedure of administration.

The administrator may, from time to time, establish the just and reasonable classifications of groups of carriers included in the term “common carrier,” or “contract carrier,” as the special nature of the service performed by carrier shall require; and such just reasonable rules, regulations, and requirements, consistent with the provisions of this chapter, to be observed by the carriers so classified or grouped, as the administrator deems necessary or desirable in the public interest.

Upon complaint in writing to the administrator by any person, organization, or body politic or upon his or her own initiative without complaint, the administrator may investigate whether any motor carrier has failed to comply with any provisions of this chapter, or with any requirements established pursuant thereto. If the administrator, after notice and hearing, finds upon any investigation that the motor carrier has failed to comply with any provisions or requirement, the administrator shall issue an appropriate order to compel the carrier to comply therewith. Whenever the administrator is of the opinion that any complaint does not state reasonable grounds for investigation and action on his or her part, he or she may dismiss the complaint. Whenever a formal investigation shall be made by the administrator, it shall be his or her duty to make a report in writing in respect thereto, which shall state the conclusions of the administrator, together with his or her decision, order, or requirement in the premises. All reports of investigations made by the administrator shall be entered of record, and a copy thereof shall be furnished to the party who may have complained and to any common carrier or contract carrier that may have been complained of.

The copies of schedules and classifications and tariffs of rates and charges, and all agreements and arrangements between common carriers filed with the administrator as provided in this chapter, and the statistics, tables, and figures contained in the annual or other reports of carriers filed with the administrator, as required under the provisions of this chapter, shall be preserved as public records in the custody of the administrator, and shall be received as prima facie evidence of what they purport to be for the purpose of investigation by the administrator and in all judicial proceedings, and copies of and extracts from any of the schedules, classifications, tariffs, agreements, or arrangements, or reports, made public records as provided in this subsection, certified by the administrator, under the administrator’s seal, shall be received in evidence with like effect as the originals.

The administrator may establish reasonable requirements with respect to maximum hours of service of employees and safety of operation and equipment.

History of Section.

P.L. 1958, ch. 87, § 1; P.L. 1969, ch. 240, § 12; P.L. 1994, ch. 328, § 3; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 113.

39-12-5.
Administration of chapter — Investigations — Hearings.

For the effective administration of this chapter as may relate to the supervision and regulation of motor carriers of property over the highways of this state in intrastate or interstate commerce, the administrator shall designate examiners, investigators, field investigators, hearing officers, regulatory inspectors, and other employees to enforce and carry into effect the provisions of this chapter; to make investigations; and to conduct hearings on any matter arising under this chapter. In conducting an investigation and/or hearing, the person so designated by the administrator shall be vested with all powers conferred on the administrator by this chapter; and upon completion of the investigation and/or hearing, the party hearing or investigating shall decide the matter at issue in hearing or under investigation and shall file his or her decision and findings in writing with the administrator, and his or her decision or finding when signed by the administrator shall be deemed the decision and order of the administrator.

The administrator, or his or her duly authorized examiners, investigators, officers, or regulatory inspectors, shall have authority to examine all equipment of motor carriers and lessors and shall have authority to inspect, examine, and copy all accounts, books, records, memoranda, correspondence, and other documents of motor carriers and/or lessors, and documents, accounts, books, records, correspondence, and memoranda of any person controlling, controlled by, or under common control of any carrier, as the administrator shall deem relevant to the person’s relation to or transaction with the carrier. Motor carriers, lessors, or persons shall submit their accounts, books, records, memoranda, correspondence, or other documents, relating to motor carrier activities only, for the inspection and copying authorized by this section, and motor carriers and lessors shall submit their equipment for examination and inspection, to any duly authorized examiner, investigator, or regulatory inspector upon demand and the display of proper credentials. The administrator shall have the power to administer oaths; summon and examine witnesses; and order the production and examination of books, accounts, records, memoranda, correspondence, and other documents in any proceeding within the jurisdiction of the administrator. All subpoenas and orders for the production of books, accounts, papers, records, and documents shall be signed and issued by the administrator and served as subpoenas in civil cases in the superior court are now served, and witnesses so subpoenaed shall be entitled to the same fees for attendance and travel as are now provided for witnesses in civil cases in the superior court.

If the person subpoenaed to attend before the division fails to obey the command of the subpoena without reasonable cause, or if a person in attendance before the administrator shall, without reasonable cause, refuse to be sworn, or to be examined, or to answer a legal or pertinent question, or if any person shall refuse to produce books, accounts, records, memoranda, correspondence, or other documents material to the issue, set forth in an order duly served on him or her, the administrator or his or her agent thereof may apply to any justice of the superior court of any county, upon proof by affidavit of the fact, for a rule or order returnable in not less than two (2) or more than five (5) days, directing the person to show cause before the justice who made the order or any justice of the superior court why he or she should not be adjudged for contempt. Upon return of the order, the justice before whom the matter is brought for a hearing shall examine under oath the person, and the person shall be given an opportunity to be heard, and if the justice shall determine that the person has refused without reasonable cause or legal excuse to be examined or to answer a legal question and a pertinent question, or to produce books, accounts, records, memoranda, correspondence, or other documents material to the issue that he or she was ordered to bring or produce, the justice may immediately commit the offender to jail, there to remain until he or she submits to do the act for which he or she was required to do, or is discharged according to law.

History of Section.

P.L. 1958, ch. 87, § 1; P.L. 1967, ch. 209, § 2.

39-12-6.
Requirement of certificate of public convenience and necessity for common carriers — Application.

Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, no person shall engage in the business of transporting property for compensation in intrastate commerce over the publicly used highways as a common carrier, unless there shall be in force with respect to the carrier a certificate of public convenience and necessity issued by the administrator authorizing the operations. Every person proposing to operate as a common carrier shall file with the administrator, in the form to be provided by him or her, an application for a certificate, accompanied by a fee of two hundred and fifty dollars ($250). All revenues received under this section shall be deposited as general revenues. Each application for a certificate shall be made in writing; shall be verified by oath or written declaration that it is made under penalties of perjury; and shall contain such information as the administrator may require. The administrator shall, within a reasonable time, fix the time and place of hearing on every application. Notice of the hearing shall be given by publication or by written notice mailed by the administrator at least ten (10) days before the date fixed thereof to all common carriers, including railroad companies, if any, serving any part of the route or territory proposed to be served by the applicant; to each person filing with the administrator a written request for the notice; and to any other person who may, in the opinion of the administrator, be interested in or affected by the issuance of the certificate. The copy of the notice, including a list of the applications to be heard, shall be publicly posted in the office of the administrator. Any person having an interest in the matter shall have the right, in accordance with rules prescribed therefor by the administrator, to make representations and to introduce evidence in favor of or in opposition to the issuance of the certificate.

History of Section.

P.L. 1935, ch. 2268, art. 3, §§ 1, 2, art. 5, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 99, art. 3, §§ 1, 2, art. 5, § 1; P.L. 1946, ch. 1805, § 1; G.L. 1956, §§

39-12-3

—

39-12-5

,

39-12-24

; G.L. 1956, §

39-12-6

; P.L. 1958, ch. 87, § 1; P.L. 1960, ch. 71, art. 3, § 32; P.L. 1980, ch. 339, § 1; P.L. 1992, ch. 133, art. 34, § 5; P.L. 1995, ch. 370, art. 40, § 118; P.L. 2007, ch. 73, art. 26, § 2; P.L. 2007, ch. 485, § 2.

39-12-7.
Issuance of certificate to common carrier.

A certificate shall be issued by the administrator, after a hearing, to any qualified applicant therefor, authorizing the whole or any part of the operations covered by the application, if it is found that the applicant is fit, willing, and able properly to perform the service proposed and to conform to the provisions of this chapter and the requirements, orders, rules, and regulations of the administrator thereunder; otherwise the application shall be denied. Any certificate issued under this chapter shall specify the service to be rendered. Certificates issued under this chapter shall be renewed before the close of business on December 31 of each calendar year. The renewal fee shall be one hundred dollars ($100) and shall be submitted with the renewal form. All revenues received under this section shall be deposited as general revenues. No certificate shall be issued to a common carrier by motor vehicle or, when issued, shall remain in force authorizing the transportation of property over the publicly used highways of this state, unless the rates and charges upon which the property is transported by the carrier shall have been published in the tariff and filed with the administrator in accordance with this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1935, ch. 2268, art. 3, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 99, art. 3, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 99, art. 3, §§ 2, 3; P.L. 1946, ch. 1805, § 1; G.L. 1956, §§

39-12-6

,

39-12-7

,

39-12-14

; P.L. 1958, ch. 87, § 1; P.L. 1992, ch. 133, art. 34, § 5; P.L. 1995, ch. 370, art. 40, § 118; P.L. 2018, ch. 176, § 18; P.L. 2018, ch. 289, § 18.

39-12-8.
Declaration of public interest in contract carriers.

It is hereby declared that the business of contract carrier, as defined in this chapter, is affected with the public interest, and that the safety and welfare of the public upon the public highways within this state, the preservation and maintenance of the highways, and the proper regulation of common carriers using highways require the regulation of contract carriers to the extent provided in this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1935, ch. 2268, art. 4, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 99, art. 4, § 1; P.L. 1946, ch. 1805, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

39-12-15

; G.L. 1956, §

39-12-8

; P.L. 1958, ch. 87, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 113.

39-12-9.
Permit requirement for contract carriers — Application.

Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, no person shall engage in the business of transporting property as a contract carrier by motor vehicle, in intrastate commerce, over the publicly used highways of this state, unless there is in force, with respect to the carrier, a permit issued by the administrator authorizing the person to engage in the business. Every person proposing to operate as a contract carrier shall file with the administrator, in the form to be provided by him or her, an application for a permit, accompanied by a fee of one hundred dollars ($100). All revenues received under this section shall be deposited as general revenues. Each application for the permit shall be made in writing; be verified under oath or written declaration that it is made under penalties of perjury; and shall contain such information as the administrator may require. The administrator shall, within a reasonable time, fix the time and place of the hearing on every application. Notice of the hearing shall be given by publication or by written notice, mailed by the administrator at least ten (10) days before the date fixed therefor, to all common and contract carriers, including railroad companies, if any, serving any part of the route or territory proposed to be served by the applicant; to each person filing with the administrator a written request for the notice; and to any other person who may, in the opinion of the administrator, be interested in or affected by the issuance of the permit. A copy of the notice, including a list of the applications to be heard, shall be publicly posted in the office of the administrator. Any person having an interest in the matter shall have the right, in accordance with the rules and regulations prescribed therefor by the administrator, to make representations and to introduce evidence in favor of or in opposition to the issuance of the permit.

History of Section.

P.L. 1935, ch. 2268, art. 4, §§ 2, 3, art. 5, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 99, art. 4, §§ 2, 3, art. 5, § 1; P.L. 1946, ch. 1805, § 1; G.L. 1956, §§

39-12-16

,

39-12-17

,

39-12-24

; G.L. 1956, §

39-12-9

; P.L. 1958, ch. 87, § 1; P.L. 1960, ch. 71, art. 3, § 32; P.L. 1980, ch. 339, § 1; P.L. 1992, ch. 133, art. 34, § 5; P.L. 1995, ch. 370, art. 40, § 118.

39-12-10.
Issuance of permit to contract carrier.

A permit shall be issued to any qualified applicant therefor authorizing, in whole or in part, the operations covered by the application, if it shall appear, after a hearing, that the applicant is fit, willing, and able properly to perform the services of a contract carrier by motor vehicle; and to conform to the provisions of this chapter and the requirements, rules, and regulations of the administrator made thereunder; and that the proposed operation, to the extent authorized by the permit, will be consistent with the public interest; otherwise, the application shall be denied. Permits issued under this chapter shall be renewed before the close of business on December 31 of each calendar year. The renewal fee shall be one hundred dollars ($100) and shall be submitted with the renewal form. All revenues received under this section shall be deposited as general revenues. The administrator shall specify in the permit the business of the contract carrier covered thereby and the scope thereof; and he or she shall attach to it at the time of issuance, and from time to time thereafter, such reasonable terms, conditions, and limitations consistent with the character of the holder as a contract carrier, as the public interest may require, but may in no way limit the number of contracts that the contract carrier may hold under the permit. The contract carrier shall have the right to substitute or add to his or her or its equipment and facilities as the development of the business may require.

History of Section.

P.L. 1935, ch. 2268, art. 4, § 4; G.L. 1938, ch. 99, art. 4, § 4; P.L. 1946, ch. 1805, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

39-12-18

; G.L. 1956, §

39-12-10

; P.L. 1958, ch. 87, § 1; P.L. 1992, ch. 133, art. 34, § 5; P.L. 1995, ch. 370, art. 40, § 118.

39-12-11.
Publication of tariffs of common carriers.

Every common carrier by motor vehicle shall print, file with the administrator, and keep open for public inspection, tariffs showing all the rates and charges for transportation, and all services in connection therewith, of property, in intrastate commerce, between points on its own routes and points on the routes of any other carrier, or on the routes of any common carrier by railroad, express, or water, when a through route and joint rate shall have been established. A filing fee of fifty dollars ($50.00) must accompany all filings made pursuant to this section. All revenues received under this section shall be deposited as general revenues. The rates and charges shall be stated in lawful money of the United States. The tariffs required by this section shall be published, filed, and posted in such form and manner, and shall contain such information as the administrator, by regulation, shall prescribe. The administrator may reject any tariff filed with him or her that is not consistent with this section and with the regulations. Any tariff so rejected by the administrator shall be void and its use shall be unlawful.

History of Section.

P.L. 1935, ch. 2268, art. 3, § 3; G.L. 1938, ch. 99, art. 3, § 3; P.L. 1946, ch. 1805, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

39-12-7

; G.L. 1956, §

39-12-11

; P.L. 1958, ch. 87, § 1; P.L. 1992, ch. 133, art. 34, § 5; P.L. 1995, ch. 370, art. 40, § 118.

39-12-12.
Establishment of rates and charges of common carriers — Rate discrimination — Rebates.

It shall be the duty of every common carrier of property by motor vehicle to establish, observe, and enforce just, reasonable, and reasonably compensatory rates, charges, and classification, and reasonable regulations and practices relating thereto, which shall become effective on a date fixed by the carrier, which shall be at least thirty (30) days after the filing of the tariff containing the rates, charges, and classification, unless suspended by the administrator, prior to the effective date of the tariff or classification, upon complaint of any person, organization, or body politic or by the administrator on his or her own motion. No change shall be made in any rate, charge, classification, or any rule, regulation, or practice affecting the rate, charge, or classification, or the value of the service thereunder specified in any tariff of a common carrier by motor vehicle, except after thirty (30) days’ notice of the proposed change filed and posted in accordance with §

39-12-11

. The notice shall plainly state the changes proposed to be made and the time when the change will take effect. The administrator, in his or her discretion and for good cause shown, may allow the publication of rates or charges or a change in classification therein, upon notice less than that specified in this section, or may modify the requirements of this section with respect to the posting and filing of tariffs and classifications, either in particular instances or by general order applicable to special or peculiar circumstances or conditions. The administrator, after a hearing, may establish, from time to time, such reasonable rules and regulations as he or she may deem necessary pertaining to the form of tariffs, classifications, or supplements thereto; the time and manner of filing thereof; the suspension of rates before the rates become effective; and bearing upon the validity of any filed or existing rate. No common carrier of property by motor vehicle shall charge or demand or collect or receive a greater or less compensation for transportation or any service in connection therewith between points enumerated in the tariff than the rates and charges specified in the filed tariffs in effect at the time; and no carrier shall refund or remit in any manner or by any device, directly or indirectly, or through any other person, any portion of the rates or charges so specified, or extend to any person any privileges or facilities for transportation in intrastate commerce, except such as are specified in its tariffs.

History of Section.

P.L. 1935, ch. 2268, art. 3, § 3; G.L. 1938, ch. 99, art. 3, § 3; P.L. 1946, ch. 1805, § 1; G.L. 1956, §§

39-12-8

—

39-12-11

; G.L. 1956, §

39-12-12

; P.L. 1958, ch. 87, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 113.

39-12-13.
Alteration of common carrier rates by the administrator.

The administrator, upon complaint of any common carrier by motor vehicle or of any person, or upon his or her own motion, after a hearing, may allow or disallow any filed or existing rates and may alter or prescribe the rates of common carriers in connection with the transportation of any or all classes of property to any or between any and all points within the state and any service connected therewith in accordance with the legal standards provided in this chapter. Whenever, upon complaint or in any investigation on his or her own initiative, the administrator, after a hearing, shall be of the opinion that any rate or charge collected, charged, or demanded by any common carrier by motor vehicle, or any classification, rule, regulation, or practice whatsoever of the carrier affecting the rate, charge, or the value of the service thereunder, is or will be unjust or unreasonable, or unjustly discriminatory, or unduly preferential, or unduly prejudicial, he or she shall determine and prescribe the lawful rate or charge, or the maximum and/or minimum rate or charge thereafter to be observed or the lawful classification, rule, regulation, or practice thereafter to be effective.

The administrator shall implement a gasoline price emergency surcharge program whereby a person licensed under this chapter to perform “driveaway-towaway operations” shall be permitted to impose and collect a surcharge, during such times and under such conditions wherein the administrator determines that the average price of gasoline in this state exceeds one dollar and fifty cents ($1.50) per gallon. Provided, that the administrator shall have discretion as to when to permit such surcharge to be imposed, except that the administrator shall not impose the surcharge at any time when the average price of gasoline, as determined by the administrator, does not exceed the price of one dollar and fifty cents ($1.50) per gallon.

The administrator shall implement a diesel price emergency surcharge program whereby a person licensed under §

39-3-3

, §

39-3-3.1

, or §

39-3-4

to perform as a “common carrier of persons and/or property upon water between termini within the state,” providing “lifeline” service as determined by the division, shall be permitted to impose and collect a surcharge for each passenger and vehicle carried, during periods when it is determined that the average retail price of diesel fuel in this state exceeds one dollar and twenty cents ($1.20) per gallon; provided, however, that no such surcharge shall be authorized for carriers providing service that is determined by the division to be “discretionary” in nature.

History of Section.

P.L. 1935, ch. 2268, art. 3, § 3; G.L. 1938, ch. 99, art. 3, § 3; P.L. 1946, ch. 1805, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

39-12-12

; G.L. 1956, §

39-12-13

; P.L. 1958, ch. 87, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 307, § 2; P.L. 2003, ch. 412, § 2; P.L. 2005, ch. 352, § 1; P.L. 2010, ch. 192, § 1; P.L. 2010, ch. 208, § 1.

39-12-14.
Factors governing determination of just and reasonable rates — Burden of proof.

In the exercise of power to prescribe just and reasonable rates and charges for the transportation of property by common carriers by motor vehicle, and classifications, regulations, and practices relating thereto, and to disallow rates filed by any carriers, the administrator shall give due consideration, among other factors, to the inherent advantages of transportation by the carriers; to the effect of rates upon the movement of traffic by the carrier or carriers for which the rates are prescribed; to the need, in the public interest, of adequate and efficient transportation service of the carriers at the lowest cost consistent with the furnishing of the service; and to the need of revenues sufficient to enable the carriers under honest, economical, and efficient management to provide such service. In any proceeding to determine the justness and reasonableness of any rates or charges of any common carrier, there shall not be taken into consideration or allowed, as evidence or elements of value of the property of the carrier, either good will, earning power, or the certificate under which the carrier is operating. At any hearing involving a change in rates, charges, or classification, or in a rule, regulation, or practice, the burden of proof shall be upon the carrier to show that the proposed rule, changed rate, charge, classification, regulation, or practice is just and reasonable.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 99, art. 3, § 3; P.L. 1946, ch. 1805, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

39-12-13

; G.L. 1956, §

39-12-14

; P.L. 1958, ch. 87, § 1.

39-12-15.
Filing of contracts by contract carriers — Form of contract.

Every contract carrier by motor vehicle shall file with the administrator a copy of every contract for the transportation of property by motor vehicle in effect in connection with its operations, which shall be in writing and shall be executed by all parties thereto. The period of time during which the contracts shall be in force; the charges for transportation and accessorial services, if any; and the duties and obligations of all parties thereto, shall be specifically stated in the contracts, and the copies shall be kept in the files of the administrator but not opened to public inspection.

History of Section.

G.L. 1956, ch. 99, art. 4, § 5; P.L. 1946, ch. 1805, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

39-12-19

; G.L. 1956, §

39-12-15

; P.L. 1958, ch. 87, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 113.

39-12-16.
Duty of contract carriers to establish reasonable rates — Publication of rate schedules — Rate discrimination — Rebates.

It shall be the duty of every contract carrier by motor vehicle to establish and observe reasonable rates and charges for any service rendered or to be rendered in the transportation of property, and to establish and observe reasonable regulations and practices to be applied in connection with the reasonable rates and charges.

It shall be the duty of every contract carrier by motor vehicle to publish; file with the administrator on not less than thirty (30) days’ notice; and keep open for public inspection in the form and manner prescribed by the administrator, schedules containing the actual rates and charges of the carrier, and any rule, regulation, or practice affecting the rates or charges, and the value of the service thereunder. A filing fee of fifty dollars ($50.00) must accompany all filings made pursuant to this section. All revenues received under this section shall be deposited as general revenues.

No contract carrier shall engage in the transportation of property, unless the effective contract or contracts are in force, and a copy or copies filed with the administrator, and/or unless the actual charges for transportation by the carrier have been published, filed, and posted in accordance with the provisions of this chapter. No contract shall be filed nor reduction made in any charge, either directly or by means of any change in any rule, regulation, or practice affecting the charge or the value of the service under the contract, except after thirty (30) days’ notice of the proposed change filed in the manner and form as provided in subsection (b) of this section; provided, that the administrator may, in his or her discretion and for good cause shown, allow the change upon less notice, or may modify the requirements of this section with respect to the posting and filing of the schedules, either in particular instances or by general order, applicable to special or peculiar circumstances or conditions.

The schedule of actual rates of every contract carrier shall contain a list of all parties with whom contracts are or may, from time to time, be in effect, without designation of the party for whom the motor carrier services are being or are to be performed.

No carrier shall demand, or collect, or charge a less compensation for transportation than the charge contained in his or her written contract and published in his or her schedule of actual rates on file with the administrator, or prescribed after a hearing by the administrator; and it shall be unlawful for any contract carrier, by the furnishing of special services, facilities, or privileges, or by any other device whatsoever, to charge, accept, or receive less than the actual rates and charges so filed or prescribed. The charges of the contract carriers shall be no less than those of common carriers for substantially the same or similar service.

History of Section.

P.L. 1935, ch. 2268, art. 4, § 5; G.L. 1938, ch. 99, art. 4, § 5; P.L. 1946, ch. 1805, § 1; G.L. 1956, §§

39-12-20

,

39-12-21

; G.L. 1956, §

39-12-16

; P.L. 1958, ch. 87, § 1; P.L. 1992, ch. 133, art. 34, § 5; P.L. 1995, ch. 370, art. 40, § 118; P.L. 1996, ch. 316, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 113.

39-12-17.
Determination as to basis of contract rate.

Any party in interest, whether as a contract carrier, common carrier, shipper, or otherwise, may, at any time, by petition or complaint, have determined whether a rate or charge prescribed for the contract carrier by the administrator, after a hearing, is based upon or includes services that the contract carrier is not required to perform under his or her contract for services. No rates or charges for contract carriers shall be prescribed by the administrator except after a hearing, notice of which has been given to the contract carriers and common carriers affected thereby, and to the shippers or to the public served by the contract carriers and common carriers. Upon a petition of not less than ten (10) persons operating as common or contract carriers in any natural subdivision, the administrator, after a hearing, and after notice to members of the natural subdivision in writing, or by publication, as the administrator may determine, shall prescribe the rates and charges, which shall not be less than the cost of performing the service, to be thereafter charged by all carriers operating within the natural subdivision for the particular type of service described in the petition, but the rates and charges shall not apply to members of the subdivision performing services other than those described in the petition.

History of Section.

P.L. 1935, ch. 2268, art. 4, §§ 6, 7; G.L. 1938, ch. 99, art. 4, §§ 6, 7; P.L. 1946, ch. 1805, § 1; G.L. 1956, §§

39-12-22

,

39-12-23

; G.L. 1956, §

39-12-17

; P.L. 1958, ch. 87, § 1.